Wyoming statutes. Title 20 Domestic Relations
Chapter 6 Child Support Enforcement

Law reviews. —

For article, “Mediation and Wyoming Domestic Relations Cases — Practical Considerations, Ethical Concerns and Proposed Standards of Practice,” see XXVII Land & Water L. Rev. 435 (1992).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

59 Am. Jur. 2d Parent and Child §§ 45 to 56, 58 to 68, 69 to 75.

Authority of court, upon entering default judgment, to make orders for child custody or support which were not specifically requested in pleadings of prevailing party, 5 ALR5th 863.

Decrease in income of obligor spouse following voluntary termination of employment as basis for modification of child support award, 39 ALR5th 1.

Enforcement of claim for alimony or support, or for attorneys' fees and costs incurred in connection therewith, against exemptions, 52 ALR5th 221.

67A C.J.S. Parent and Child §§ 73 to 88.